Missouri, session 2026, HB3028.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 349.045, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 349.045, to read as follows:
349.045. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the corporation shall
have a board of directors in which all the powers of the corporation shall be vested and which
shall consist of any number of directors, not less than five, all of whom shall be duly qualified
electors of and taxpayers in the county or municipality; except that, for any industrial
development corporation formed by any municipality located wholly within any county of the
second, third, or fourth classification or any county of the first classification with more than
sixty-five thousand but fewer than seventy-five thousand inhabitants, directors may be
qualified taxpayers in and registered voters of such county. The directors shall serve as such
without compensation except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred
in and about the performance of their duties hereunder. The directors shall be resident
taxpayers for at least one year immediately prior to their appointment. No director shall be an
officer or employee of the county or municipality. All directors shall be appointed by the
chief executive officer of the county or municipality with the advice and consent of a majority
of the governing body of the county or municipality, and in all counties, other than a city not
within a county and counties with a charter form of government, the appointments shall be
made by the county commission and they shall be so appointed that they shall hold office for
staggered terms. At the time of the appointment of the first board of directors the governing
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3028 2
body of the municipality or county shall divide the directors into three groups containing as
nearly equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in
the first group shall be two years, the first term of the directors included in the second group
shall be four years, the first term of the directors in the third group shall be six years;
provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor thereto shall
not have been appointed, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall
continue to hold office until a successor shall be appointed by the chief executive officer of
the county or municipality with the advice and consent of a majority of the governing body of
the county or municipality. The successors shall be resident taxpayers for at least one year
immediately prior to their appointment.
2. (1) A corporation in a county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than ten thousand four hundred but fewer than ten thousand five
hundred inhabitants shall have a board of directors in which all the powers of the corporation
shall be vested and which shall consist of a number of directors not less than the number of
townships in such county. All directors shall be duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the
county. Each township within the county shall elect one director to the board. Additional
directors may be elected to the board to succeed directors appointed to the board as of the
effective date of this section if the number of directors on the effective date of this section
exceeds the number of townships in the county. The directors shall serve as such without
compensation except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties. The directors shall be resident taxpayers for at least one year
immediately prior to their election. No director shall be an officer or employee of the county.
Upon the expiration of the term of office of any director appointed to the board prior to the
effective date of this section, a director shall be elected to succeed him or her; provided that if
at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor thereto shall not have been
elected, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall continue to hold office
until a successor shall be elected. The successors shall be resident taxpayers for at least one
year immediately prior to their election.
(2) For any election after August 28, 2026, the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section regarding director qualifications shall supersede subdivision (1) of this
subsection. Upon the expiration of the term of the last director elected before August
28, 2026, all provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall terminate, and the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall apply to any corporation in such a county.
✔